Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-134
Examinations; oral or practical; approval of national or other examination.

(1) The oral or practical work portion of any examination for a credential under the Uniform Credentialing Act may be given by the members of the appropriate board, the department, or an organization approved by the appropriate board or the department if there is no board. The oral examination questions shall be limited to the practice of the profession.

(2) The appropriate board may approve any national or other examination to constitute part or all of the credentialing examination for any of the professions which are regulated by the Uniform Credentialing Act.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 33, p. 462;

C.S.1929, § 71-409;

R.S.1943, § 71-133;

Laws 1979, LB 427, § 18;

Laws 1982, LB 449, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 450, § 1;

Laws 1982, LB 448, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 470, § 4;

Laws 1984, LB 481, § 15;

Laws 1986, LB 286, § 39;

Laws 1986, LB 579, § 31;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 14;

Laws 1989, LB 489, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 1064, § 6;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 35;

Laws 2001, LB 209, § 2;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-133;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 34.